src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ========================
! Sublexica for verb roots
! ========================

! Main types, from Bokmålsordboka
! v1  kaste       kaster      kasta       kasta
!                             kastet      kastet
! v2  lyse        lyser       lyste       lyst
!     reparere    reparerer   reparerte   reparert
! v3  leve        lever       levde       levd
! v4  nå          når         nådde       nådd
! v4  bie         bier        bidde       bidd
!
! Subtypes
! v12 v1 or v2
! v13 v1 or v3
! v14 v1 or v4
! v1-s passive v1 verbs
! v2-s passive v2 verbs
! v3-s passive v3 verbs

! =========================== !
! Sublexica for regular verbs !
! =========================== !


LEXICON vx
  +X: v1 ; ! ditto

LEXICON v12 ! score -> scoret, scorte
                 +V:     inf-prsptc ;
                 +V:     regpres    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Nynorsk:%>ar #          ;
                         a-et-pret  ;
                        te-pret    ;

LEXICON v13 ! sveve -> svevet, svevde.
                 +V:     inf-prsptc ;
                 +V:     regpres    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Nynorsk:%>ar #          ;
                         a-et-pret  ;
                         de-pret    ;


LEXICON v23
  v2 ;
  v3 ;

LEXICON v14
  v1 ;
  v4 ;

LEXICON v1 ! kaste
                 +V:     inf-prsptc ;
                 +V:     regpres    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Nynorsk:%>ar #          ;
                         a-et-pret  ;


LEXICON v2 ! blåse, studere
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres    ;
   te-pret    ;

LEXICON v3 ! leve
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres    ;
     de-pret    ;

LEXICON v4 ! ro, bie
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: r-pres     ;
     dde-pret   ;

LEXICON v-s ! fritas
     +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;

LEXICON v1-s ! undres
     +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt: # ;
  +PrfPtc: # ;

LEXICON v2-s ! føles, synes
     +Inf:   # ;
 +Ind+Prs:   # ;
 +Ind+Prt:Q1 # ;
  +PrfPtc:Q1 # ;

LEXICON v3-s ! trives
     +Inf:   # ;
 +Ind+Prs:   # ;
 +Ind+Prt:Q2 # ;
  +PrfPtc:Q2 # ;





! ---------------------
! Conjugation sublexica
! ---------------------

LEXICON inf-prsptc
             +Inf:       #          ;
        +Inf+Pass:%>s  # ;
     +Inf+Nynorsk:%>a    #          ;
+Inf+Pass+Nynorsk:%>ast # ;
             +Imp:Q3X4   #          ;
          +PrsPtc:%>     prfptcsuff ;
  +PrsPtc+Nynorsk:%>ande #          ;
             +ING:%>ing  #          ;

LEXICON regpres
              +Ind+Prs:%>er  # ;
         +Ind+Prs+Pass:%>es  # ;
      +Ind+Prs+Nynorsk:%>ast # ;

LEXICON r-pres
              +Ind+Prs:%>r  # ;
         +Ind+Prs+Pass:%>s  # ;
 +Ind+Prs+Pass+Nynorsk:%>st # ;

LEXICON a-et-pret
 +V+Ind+Prt+Radical:%>a  # ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:%>et # ;
  +V+PrfPtc+Radical:%>a  # ;
          +V+PrfPtc:%>et # ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPtc+A:%et positive-indef ;
       +Ex/V+PrfPtc+A:%ede positive-def ;
LEXICON te-pret
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>Q3te # ;
  +V+PrfPtc:%>Q3t  # ;
  +Ex/V+PrfPtc+A:%>Q3t  positive ; ! over til adj
 
LEXICON de-pret
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>Q3de # ;
  +V+PrfPtc:%>Q3d  # ;
  +Ex/V+PrfPtc+A:%>Q3d  positive ;

LEXICON dde-pret
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
  +V+PrfPtc:%>dd  # ;
  +Ex/V+PrfPtc+A:%>dd  positive ;


LEXICON prfptcsuff
         :ende # ;
 +Nynorsk:ande # ;



! ============================= !
! Sublexica for irregular verbs !
! ============================= !


LEXICON BE
          +V+Inf:be   #          ;
          +V+Imp:be   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:ber  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bes  #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:bes  #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:ba   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:bedt #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:be   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BINDE
          +V+Inf:binde  #          ;
          +V+Imp:bind   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:binder #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bindes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:bindes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:bandt  #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:bundet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:bind   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON XITE
          ite+V+Inf:ite  #          ;
          ite+V+Imp:it   #          ;
      ite+V+Ind+Prs:iter #          ;
 ite+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ites #          ;
     ite+V+Inf+Pass:ites #          ;
      ite+V+Ind+Prt:et   #          ;
      ite+V+Ind+Prt:eit  #          ;
       ite+V+PrfPtc:itt  #          ;
       ite+V+PrsPtc:it   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BLI
             +V+Inf:bli   #          ;
             +V+Imp:bli   #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:blir  #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:ble   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Radical:blei  #          ;
          +V+PrfPtc:blitt #          ;
          +V+PrsPtc:bliv  prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BLIVE
             +V+Inf:blive    # ;
             +V+Imp:bliv     # ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:bliver   # ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:blev     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Radical:bleiv    # ;
          +V+PrfPtc:blevet   # ;
          +V+PrsPtc:blivende # ;

LEXICON BRENNE
          +V+Inf:brenne  #          ;
          +V+Imp:brenn   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:brenner #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brennes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:brennes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brant   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brente  #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:brent   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:brunnet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:brenn   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BRESTE
          +V+Inf:breste  #          ;
          +V+Imp:brest   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:brester #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brestes #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:brestes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brast   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:brustet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:brest   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BRINGE
     +V+Inf:bringe  #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:bringes  #          ;
     +V+Imp:bring   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:bringer #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bringes #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:brakte  #          ;
  +V+PrfPtc:brakt   #          ;
  +V+PrsPtc:bring   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BRISTE
          +V+Inf:briste  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:briste  #          ;
          +V+Imp:brist   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:brister #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bristes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brast   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:brustet #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:brist   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON XYTE
             +V+Inf:yte  #          ;
             +V+Inf+Pass:ytes  #          ;
             +V+Imp:yt   #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:yter #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ytes #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:øt   #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:øyt  #          ;
          +V+PrfPtc:utt  #          ;
          +V+PrsPtc:yt   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BURDE
     +V+Inf:burde # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:bør   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:burde # ;

LEXICON BY
          +V+Inf:by   #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:by   #          ;
          +V+Imp:by   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:byr  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bys  #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:bød  #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:bydd #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:by   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON XYDE
          +V+Inf:yde  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:ydes  #          ;
          +V+Imp:yd   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:yder #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ydes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:ød   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:ydd  #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:yd   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON BÆRE
          +V+Inf:bære  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:bæres  #          ;
          +V+Imp:bær   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:bærer #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bæres #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:bar   #          ;
       +V+PrfPtc:båret #          ;
       +V+PrsPtc:bær   prfptcsuff ;

LEXICON XETTE
          ette+V+Inf:ette  #          ;
          ette+V+Inf+Pass:ettes  #          ;
          ette+V+Imp:ett   #          ;
      ette+V+Ind+Prs:etter #          ;
 ette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ettes #          ;
      ette+V+Ind+Prt:att   #          ;
       ette+V+PrfPtc:ettet #          ;
       ette+V+PrsPtc:ett   prfptcsuff ;
