src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON irregular-verb
              be:          BE      ;
           frabe:fra       BE      ;
           tilbe:til       BE      ;
            utbe:ut       BE      ;
           binde:          BINDE   ;
           forbinde:       BINDE   ;
           innbinde:       BINDE   ;
           målbinde:       BINDE   ;
        sammenbinde:       BINDE   ;
         svinebinde:       BINDE   ;
           bil:       BLI     ;
           forbli:for       BLI     ;
           utebli:ute       BLI     ;
           vedbli:ved       BLI     ;
            blive:    BLIVE   ;
            brenne:         BRENNE  ;
            breste:         BRESTE  ;
              bringe:       BRINGE  ;
            anbringe:an       BRINGE  ;
            bibringe:bi       BRINGE  ;
          frambringe:fram       BRINGE  ;
          frembringe:frem       BRINGE  ;
           innbringe:inn       BRINGE  ;
          overbringe:over       BRINGE  ;
           tilbringe:til       BRINGE  ;
       tilveiebringe:tilveie       BRINGE  ;
            utbringe:ut       BRINGE  ;
             briste:  BRISTE  ;
              bryte:br       XYTE   ;
            avbryte:avbr       XYTE   ;
           forbryte:forbr       XYTE   ;
            utbryte:utbr       XYTE   ;
           burde:          BURDE   ;
         forby:for   BY      ;
         tilby:til   BY      ;
   byde:b            XYDE    ;
  tilbyde:tilb       XYDE    ;
         bære:            BÆRE    ;
          innebære:inne       BÆRE    ;
          oppebære:oppe       BÆRE    ;
             d       XETTE   ; ! dette
           skv       XETTE   ;
           spr       XETTE   ;
             b       XITE    ;
          småb       XITE    ; ! bite
             l       XITE    ;
            sk       XITE    ;
         skamb       XITE    ;
            sl       XITE    ;
LEXICON regular-verb
finnes v-s ;
frifinnes v-s ;
fritas v-s ;
sees v-s ;
strides v-s ;
tvinges v-s ;
ødelegges v-s ;
avsondre v1 ;
bemanne v1 ;
bygsle v1 ;
feie v1 ;
forsake v1 ;
glefse v1 ;
huie v1 ;
klaffe v1 ;
lagre v1 ;
mugne v1 ;
pirre v1 ;
rocke v1 ;
skjelvne v1 ;
snevre v1 ;
sulke v1 ;
trikse v1 ;
valte v1 ;
avrundes v1-s ;
bevares v1-s ;
blendes v1-s ;
dannes v1-s ;
djevles v1-s ;
eldes v1-s ;
ferdes v1-s ;
fortsettes v1-s ;
grønnes v1-s ;
knyttes v1-s ;
ledes v1-s ;
misfarges v1-s ;
oppheves v1-s ;
samles v1-s ;
slektes v1-s ;
slites v1-s ;
tilsmusses v1-s ;
veltes v1-s ;
beile v12 ;
bleike v12 ;
bleke v12 ;
bule v12 ;
flenge v12 ;
gaule v12 ;
leike v12 ;
måke v12 ;
pole v12 ;
rake v12 ;
score v12 ;
sleike v12 ;
smule v12 ;
sole v12 ;
spjåke v12 ;
sprike v12 ;
understreke v12 ;
vake v12 ;
ydmyke v12 ;
dreie v13 ;
greie v13 ;
jage v13 ;
lage v13 ;
meie v13 ;
nage v13 ;
overtyde v13 ;
plage v13 ;
sage v13 ;
sveve v13 ;
våge v13 ;
innvie v14 ;
kvie v14 ;
vie v14 ;
amputere v2 ;
atomisere v2 ;
briljere v2 ;
disiplinere v2 ;
estimere v2 ;
forbrenne:for BRENNE ;
forvrenge v2 ;
handhelse v2 ;
institusjonalisere v2 ;
kollokvere v2 ;
kvine v2 ;
modulere v2 ;
opponere v2 ;
pomadisere v2 ;
rasjonere v2 ;
råskjære v2 ;
socialisere v2 ;
tatuere v2 ;
uteksaminere v2 ;
føles v2-s ;
glemmes v2-s ;
høres v2-s ;
innmeldes v2-s ;
kjennes v2-s ;
knuses v2-s ;
kveles v2-s ;
lykkes v2-s ;
minnes v2-s ;
mistrives v2-s ;
møtes v2-s ;
oppleves v2-s ;
pines v2-s ;
saksøkes v2-s ;
skilles v2-s ;
skjemmes v2-s ;
snakkes v2-s ;
vises v2-s ;
sprede v23 ;
avkreve v3 ;
befri v3 ;
belære v3 ;
blære v3 ;
dryge v3 ;
etterleve v3 ;
forebygge v3 ;
fortære v3 ;
gjære v3 ;
høve v3 ;
kjøve v3 ;
lære v3 ;
oppleve v3 ;
overleve v3 ;
røde v3 ;
stride v3 ;
underbygge v3 ;
veve v3 ;
bøyes v3-s ;
plages v3-s ;
trives v3-s ;
tøyes v3-s ;
vantrives v3-s ;
bekle v4 ;
bety v4 ;
bla v4 ;
bo v4 ;
bry v4 ;
byfornye v4 ;
flø v4 ;
fø v4 ;
gre v4 ;
innby v4 ;
kry v4 ;
re v4 ;
skje v4 ;
sky v4 ;
spa v4 ;
strø v4 ;
tilrå v4 ;
trø v4 ;
tilbyde:tilb XYDE ;
forbyde:forb XYDE ;
lyde:l XYDE ;
adlyde:adl XYDE ;
gjenlyde:gjenl XYDE ;
forlyde:Forl XYDE ;
jage v13 ;
lage v13 ;
nage v13 ;
rage v13 ;
gnelle vx ;
gnåle vx ;
strime vx ;
tromme v1 ;
utspinne vx ;
unne vx ;
tynne vx ;
done vx ;
lepe v2 ;
snipe vx ;
glåpe vx ;
gåre vx ;
vase vx ;
mose vx ;
ause vx ;
bruse v1 ;
nyse vx ;
påse vx ;
te v4 ;
kyte vx ;
fortryte vx ;
skjøte vx ;
sive vx ;
lyve vx ;
etterprøve v3 ;
